test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_U_gt-norm.yaml
     tla g̲u+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: tla g̲u
     tla g̲u+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla g̲uga
     tla g̲u+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u
     tla g̲u+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲ugáng
     tla g̲u+V+DIRECT+PAST: tla g̲ugán
     tla g̲u+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla g̲uyáa
     tla g̲u+V+INDIRECT+PAST: tla g̲uyáan
     tla g̲u+V+RELATIVE: tla g̲us
     tla g̲u+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: tla g̲uyáas
     tla g̲u+V+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲uáng
     tla g̲u+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲uyáa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugáng
     tla g̲u+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugánggang
     tla g̲u+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲ugángang
     tla g̲u+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugíinii
     tla g̲u+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugáangaa
     tla g̲u+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugáangaan
     tla g̲u+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: tla g̲uäsáa
     tla g̲u+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: tla g̲uäs
     tla g̲u+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: tla g̲uäsáang
     tla g̲u+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: tla g̲uäsga
     tla g̲u+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: tla g̲uäsáas
     tla g̲u+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲uäsáa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲uáng k̲asa'áa
     tla g̲u+V+NEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲uáng k̲asa'áang
     tla g̲u+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲uáng k̲asaasdláa
     tla g̲u+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲uáng k̲asaasdláang
     tla g̲u+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'úuj
     tla g̲u+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'úujang
     tla g̲u+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: tla g̲uäsáa'uujang
     tla g̲u+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'us
     tla g̲u+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'ujáa
     tla g̲u+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'úujaangaa
     tla g̲u+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: tla g̲uäsáa'us
     tla g̲u+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: tla g̲u'ahlánggang
     tla g̲u+V+CERTAIN+PAST: tla g̲u'ahlánggan
     tla g̲u+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'ahlánggiinii
     tla g̲u+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: tla g̲uäsáa'ahlans
     tla g̲u+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: tla g̲u'ahláns
     tla g̲u+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: tla g̲uyáa'ahlang
     tla g̲u+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: tla g̲uyáa'ahlanggaa
     tla g̲u+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: tla g̲uyáa'ahlanggang
     tla g̲u+V+REFLEXIVE: tla g̲u'ahl
     tla g̲u+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: tla g̲uäséehl
     tla g̲u+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: tla g̲u'úu
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'wáa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'wáa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'wáang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: tla g̲u'wägán
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'áawaa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: tla g̲u'áawaan
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: tla g̲u'wáas
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: tla g̲u'áawaas
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'áawaa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugáng'waa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugáng'waang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲ugáng'waa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'wägíinii
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'wägáangaa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'wägáangaan
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: tla g̲u'wáaäsaa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: tla g̲u'wáaäs
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáaäsaang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáaäsga
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáaäsaas
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'wáaäsaa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'wáa'uuj
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'wáa'uujang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: tla g̲u'wáaäsaa'uujang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'wáa'us
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'wáa'ujaa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'wáa'uujaangaa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáaäsaa'us
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: tla g̲u'wáa'ahlanggang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: tla g̲u'wáa'ahlanggan
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: tla g̲u'wáa'ahlans
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'áawaa'ahlang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: tla g̲u'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áawaa'ahlanggang
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: tla g̲u'wáa'ahl
     tla g̲u+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: tla g̲u'wáaäseehl
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: tla g̲u'áng
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'ángga
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'ánggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: tla g̲u'ánggan
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'áangaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: tla g̲u'áangaan
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: tla g̲u'áns
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: tla g̲u'áangaas
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'angáng
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'áangaa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'ánggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugáng'anggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲ugáng'angang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'ánggiinii
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'ánggaangaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'ánggaangaan
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: tla g̲u'ángäsaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: tla g̲u'ángäs
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'ángäsaang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'ángäsga
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'ángäsaas
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'ángäsaa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲uáng k̲asaa'áng
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲uáng k̲asaa'ánggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲uáng k̲asaasdlä'áng
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲uáng k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'uuj
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'uujang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: tla g̲u'ángäsaa'uujang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'us
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'áng'ujaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'áng'uujaangaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'ángäsaa'us
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áang'ahlanggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: tla g̲u'áang'ahlanggan
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'áang'ahlanggiinii
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: tla g̲u'ángäsaa'ahlans
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: tla g̲u'áang'ahlans
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'áangaa'ahlang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: tla g̲u'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áangaa'ahlanggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: tla g̲u'áang'ahl
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: tla g̲u'ángäseehl
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: tla g̲u'áng'uu
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'waa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'waa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'waang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: tla g̲u'áng'wägan
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'áng'aawaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: tla g̲u'áng'aawaan
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: tla g̲u'áng'waas
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: tla g̲u'áng'aawaas
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'áng'waa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'áng'aawaa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugáng'ang'waa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla g̲ugáng'ang'waang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲ugáng'ang'waa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'áng'wägiinii
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'áng'wägaangaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'áng'wägaangaan
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: tla g̲u'áng'waaäsaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: tla g̲u'áng'waaäs
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'áng'waaäsaang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'áng'waaäsga
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'áng'waaäsaas
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: tla g̲u'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla g̲u'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'waa'uuj
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'waa'uujang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: tla g̲u'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'waa'us
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'áng'waa'ujaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: tla g̲u'áng'waaäsaa'us
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: tla g̲u'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: tla g̲u'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: tla g̲u'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: tla g̲u'áng'waa'ahlans
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: tla g̲u'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: tla g̲u'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     tla g̲u+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: tla g̲u'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
